Utah statutes.
53-3-204.   Persons who may not be licensed.
(1) (a)  The division may not license a person who:
(i)  is younger than 16 years of age;
(ii)  has not completed a course in driver training approved by the
commissioner;
(iii)  if the person is a minor, has not completed the driving requirement
under Section 53-3-211;
(iv)  is not a resident of the state, unless the person is issued a temporary
CDL under Subsection 53-3-407(2)(b); or
(v)  if the person is 17 years of age or younger, has not held a learner
permit issued under Section 53-3-210.5 for six months.
(b) Subsections (1)(a)(i), (ii), and (iii) do not apply to a person:
(i)  who has been licensed before July 1, 1967; or
(ii)  who is 16 years of age or older making application for a license who has
been licensed in another state or country.
(2)  The division may not issue a license certificate to a person:
(a)  whose license has been suspended, denied, cancelled, or disqualified
during the period of suspension, denial, cancellation, or disqualification;
(b)  whose privilege has been revoked, except as provided in Section 53-3-225;
(c)  who has previously been adjudged mentally incompetent and who has not at
the time of application been restored to competency as provided by law;
(d)  who is required by this chapter to take an examination unless the person
successfully passes the examination; or
(e)  whose driving privileges have been denied or suspended under:
(i)  Section 78A-6-606 by an order of the juvenile court; or
(ii)  Section 53-3-231.
(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(c), the division may not grant a
motorcycle endorsement to a person who:
(i)  has not been granted an original or provisional class D license, a CDL,
or an out-of-state equivalent to an original or provisional class D license or
a CDL; and
(ii)  if the person is under 19 years of age, has not held a motorcycle
learner permit for two months unless Subsection (3)(b) applies.
(b)  The division may waive the two month motorcycle learner permit holding
period requirement under Subsection (3)(a)(ii) if the person proves to the
satisfaction of the division that the person has completed a motorcycle rider
education program that meets the requirements under Section 53-3-903.
(c)  The division may grant a motorcycle endorsement to a person under 19
years of age who has not held a motorcycle learner permit for two months if
the person was issued a motorcycle endorsement prior to July 1, 2008.
(4)  The division may grant a class D license to a person whose commercial
license is disqualified under Part 4, Uniform Commercial Driver License Act,
if the person is not otherwise sanctioned under this chapter.
